Washington statutes.
RCW 3.38.022

Location of offices and courtrooms.

The districting plan may provide that the offices and courtrooms of more than one district may be in the same building: PROVIDED, That no office or courtroom of any district shall be located further than two miles outside the boundary of the district which it serves.

[ 1984 c 258 s 24; 1963 c 213 s 1.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.